Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 20 URBAN RENEWAL LAW
§ 50-2012. Issuance of bonds.

An urban renewal agency shall have power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion to finance the undertaking of any urban renewal project under this act, including, without limiting the generality thereof, the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans or preliminary loans, and shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the payment or retirement of such bonds previously issued by it. Such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the income, proceeds, revenues, and funds of the urban renewal agency derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out of urban renewal projects under this act: Provided, however, that payment of such bonds, both as to principal and interest, may be further secured by a pledge of any loan, grant or contribution from the federal government or other source, in aid of any urban renewal projects under this act, and by a mortgage of any such urban renewal projects, or any part thereof, title to which is in the urban renewal agency.

Bonds issued under this section shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction, and shall not be subject to the provisions of any other law or charter relating to the authorization, issuance or sale of bonds. Bonds and other obligations of an urban renewal agency (and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt of the municipality, the state or any political subdivision thereof, and neither the municipality, the state nor any political subdivision thereof shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall such bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds other than those of said urban renewal agency. Bonds issued under the provisions of this act are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempted from all taxes.

Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the urban renewal agency and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time, or times, bear interest at a rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either with or without coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of repayment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium), be secured in such manner, and have such other characteristics, as may be provided by such resolution or ordinance, or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

Such bonds may be sold at not less than par at public or private sales held after notice published prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in such other medium of publication as the agency may determine or may be exchanged for other bonds on the basis of par: Provided, that such bonds may be sold to the federal government at private sale at not less than par, and, in the event less than all of the authorized principal amount on such bonds is sold to the federal government, the balance may be sold at private sale at not less than par at an interest cost to the agency of not to exceed the interest cost to the agency of the portion of the bonds sold to the federal government.

In case any of the officials of the urban renewal agency whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under this act shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this act shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this act or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the agency in connection with an urban renewal project, as herein defined, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and carried out in accordance with the provisions of this act.

§ 50-2013. Bonds as legal investments.

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business, all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by an urban renewal agency pursuant to this act: Provided that such bonds and other obligations shall be secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government in which the issuer agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuer, prior to the maturity of such bonds or other obligations, moneys in an amount which (together with any other moneys irrevocably committed to the payment of principal and interest on such bonds or other obligations) will suffice to pay the principal of such bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which moneys under the terms of said agreement are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on such bonds or other obligations at their maturity. Such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits. It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

§ 50-2014. Property exempt from taxes and from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.

All property of an urban renewal agency, including funds, owned or held by it for the purposes of this act shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall judgment against an agency be a charge or lien upon such property: Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of and pledge or lien given pursuant to this act by an agency on its rents, fees, grants or revenues from urban renewal projects.

The property of an urban renewal agency, acquired or held for the purposes of this act, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and effective the date an urban renewal agency acquires title to such property it shall be exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof: Provided, that such tax exemption shall terminate when the agency sells, leases or otherwise disposes of such property in an urban renewal area for redevelopment to a purchaser or lessee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption with respect to such property.

§ 50-2015. Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project and related activities authorized by this act, any public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine: (1) dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to an urban renewal agency; (2) incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers granted in this section; (3) do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of an urban renewal plan and related activities; (4) grant or contribute funds to an urban renewal agency and borrow money and apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions, and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, county or other public body, or from any other source; (5) enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with the federal government, an urban renewal agency or other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this act, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal project and related activities; and (6) cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places; plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the urban renewal agency. If at any time title to or possession of any urban renewal project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the urban renewal agency, which is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of urban renewal projects and related activities (including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America), the provisions of the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency.

Any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of any urban renewal project and related activities of an urban renewal agency, a municipality may (in addition to its other powers and upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine) do and perform any or all of the actions or things which, by the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a public body is authorized to do or perform, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance: Provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed as authorizing a municipality to give credit or make loans to an urban renewal agency.
(d) For the purposes of this section, a municipality may (in addition to its other powers):

appropriate such funds and make such expenditures as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this act, and levy taxes and assessments for curbs and gutters, streets and sidewalks; zone or rezone any part of the municipality or make exceptions from building regulations; and enter into agreements with an urban renewal agency (which agreements may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provisions or rule of law to the contrary), respecting action to be taken by such municipality pursuant to any of the powers granted by this act:[;]

close, vacate, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places; and plan or replan any part of the municipality;

within its area of operation, organize, coordinate and direct the administration of the provisions of this act as they apply to such municipality in order that the objective of remedying slum and blighted areas and preventing the causes thereof within such municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and establish such new office or offices of the municipality or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out such purpose most effectively; and

assume the responsibility to bear any loss that may arise as the result of the exercise of authority by the urban renewal agency under subsection (d) of section 50-2007, Idaho Code, in the event that the real property is not made a part of the urban renewal project.

(e) For the purposes of this section, or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project and related activities of a municipality, such municipality may issue and sell its general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the applicable laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of general obligation bonds by such municipality. Nothing in this section shall limit or otherwise adversely affect any other section of this act.

(f) Purchase and buy or otherwise acquire land in a project area from an agency for redevelopment in accordance with the plan, with or without consideration as the agency may determine. Any public body which purchases, buys or otherwise acquires land in a project area from an agency for development pursuant to this subsection shall become obligated to:

(1) use the property for the purpose designated in the redevelopment plans;

(2) begin the redevelopment of the project area within a period of time which the agency fixes as reasonable; and

(3) comply with other conditions which the agency deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

§ 50-2016. Title of purchaser.

Any instrument executed by an urban renewal agency and purporting to convey any right, title or interest in any property under this act shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions of this act insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees or transferees of such property is concerned.

§ 50-2017. Interested public officials, commissioners or employees.

No public official or employee of a municipality (or board or commission thereof), and no commissioner or employee of an urban renewal agency shall voluntarily acquire any personal interest, direct or indirect, in any urban renewal project, or in any property included or planned to be included in any urban renewal project in such municipality or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with such urban renewal project. Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the agency and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the agency. If any such official, commissioner or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two (2) years, any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which he knows is included or planned to be included in an urban renewal project, he shall immediately disclose this fact in writing to the agency, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the agency, and any such official, commissioner or employee shall not participate in any action by the municipality (or board or commission thereof), or urban renewal agency affecting such property. Any violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute misconduct in office.

§ 50-2018. Definitions.

The following terms wherever used or referred to in this chapter, shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

“Agency” or “urban renewal agency” shall mean a public agency created by section 50-2006, Idaho Code.

“Municipality” shall mean any incorporated city or town, or county in the state.

“Public body” shall mean the state or any municipality, township, board, commission, authority, district, or any other subdivision or public body of the state.

“Local governing body” shall mean the council or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality.

“Mayor” shall mean the mayor of a municipality or other officer or body having the duties customarily imposed upon the executive head of a municipality.

“Clerk” shall mean the clerk or other official of the municipality who is the custodian of the official records of such municipality.

“Federal government” shall include the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Deteriorated area” shall mean an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare. Provided however, this definition shall not apply to any agricultural operation, as defined in section 22-4502(2), Idaho Code, absent the consent of the owner of the agricultural operation or to any forest land as defined in section 63-1701(4), Idaho Code, absent the consent of the forest landowner, as defined in section 63-1701(5), Idaho Code, except for an agricultural operation or forest land that has not been used for three (3) consecutive years.

“Deteriorating area” shall mean an area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures, predominance of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility or usefulness, insanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare in its present condition and use; provided, that if such deteriorating area consists of open land the conditions contained in the proviso in section 50-2008(d), Idaho Code, shall apply; and provided further, that any disaster area referred to in section 50-2008(g), Idaho Code, shall constitute a deteriorating area. Provided however, this definition shall not apply to any agricultural operation, as defined in section 22-4502(2), Idaho Code, absent the consent of the owner of the agricultural operation or to any forest land as defined in section 63-1701(4), Idaho Code, absent the consent of the forest landowner, as defined in section 63-1701(5), Idaho Code, except for an agricultural operation or forest land that has not been used for three (3) consecutive years.
(10) “Urban renewal project” may include undertakings and activities of a municipality in an urban renewal area for the elimination of deteriorated or deteriorating areas and for the prevention of the development or spread of slums and blight, and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an urban renewal area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an urban renewal area, or any combination or part thereof in accordance with an urban renewal plan. Such undertakings and activities may include:

Acquisition of a deteriorated area or a deteriorating area or portion thereof;

Demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, off-street parking facilities, public facilities or buildings and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the urban renewal area the urban renewal objectives of this chapter in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Disposition of any property acquired in the urban renewal area, including sale, initial leasing or retention by the agency itself, at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan except for disposition of property to another public body;

Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Acquisition of real property in the urban renewal area which, under the urban renewal plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or rehabilitation of the structures for guidance purposes, and resale of the property;

Acquisition of any other real property in the urban renewal area where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, insanitary or unsafe conditions, lessen density, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or otherwise to remove or to prevent the spread of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities;

Lending or investing federal funds; and

Construction of foundations, platforms and other like structural forms.

(11) “Urban renewal area” means a deteriorated area or a deteriorating area or a combination thereof which the local governing body designates as appropriate for an urban renewal project.

(12) “Urban renewal plan” means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for an urban renewal project, which plan:

(a) Shall conform to the general plan for the municipality as a whole except as provided in section 50-2008(g), Idaho Code; and

(b) Shall be sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the urban renewal area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, building requirements, and any method or methods of financing such plan, which methods may include revenue allocation financing provisions.

(13) “Related activities” shall mean:

(a) Planning work for the preparation or completion of a community-wide plan or program pursuant to section 50-2009, Idaho Code; and

(b) The functions related to the acquisition and disposal of real property pursuant to section 50-2007(d), Idaho Code.
(14) “Real property” shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, right and use, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise.

(15) “Bonds” shall mean any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures or other obligations.

(16) “Obligee” shall include any bondholder, agents or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the municipality property used in connection with urban renewal, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the municipality.

(17) “Person” shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and shall include any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a similar representative capacity.

(18) “Area of operation” shall mean the area within the corporate limits of the municipality and the area within five (5) miles of such limits, except that it shall not include any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of another incorporated city or town or within the unincorporated area of the county unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such other city, town or county declaring a need therefor.

(19) “Board” or “commission” shall mean a board, commission, department, division, office, body or other unit of the municipality.

(20) “Public officer” shall mean any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality relating to health, fire, building regulations, or to other activities concerning dwellings in the municipality.

§ 50-2019 — 50-2026. Revenue allocation — Procedures — Purposes. [Repealed.]

§ 50-2027. Limitations on review of adoption or modification of plan, and issuance of bonds.

No direct or collateral action attacking or otherwise questioning the validity of any urban renewal plan, project or modification thereto (including one containing a revenue allocation provision), or the adoption or approval of such plan, project or modification, or any of the findings or determinations of the agency or the local governing body in connection with such plan, project or modification, shall be brought prior to the effective date of the ordinance adopting or modifying the plan. No direct or collateral action attacking or otherwise questioning the validity of bonds issued pursuant to section 50-2012, Idaho Code, or section 50-2026(a), Idaho Code, shall be brought prior to the effective date of the resolution or ordinance authorizing such bonds.

For a period of thirty (30) days after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution, any person in interest shall have the right to contest the legality of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds which may be authorized thereby. No contest or proceeding to question the validity or legality of any ordinance, resolution or proceeding, or any bonds which may be authorized thereby, passed or adopted under the provisions of this chapter shall be brought in any court by any person for any cause whatsoever, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the effective date of the ordinance, resolution or proceeding, and after such time the validity, legality and regularity of such ordinance, resolution or proceeding or any bonds authorized thereby shall be conclusively presumed. If the question of the validity of any adopted plan or bonds issued pursuant to this chapter is not raised within thirty (30) days from the effective date of the ordinance, resolution or proceeding issuing said bonds and fixing their terms, the authority of the plan, the authority adopting the plan, or the authority to issue the bonds, and the legality thereof, the same shall be conclusively presumed and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matters.

§ 50-2028 — 50-2030. Revenue allocation termination — Effect of revenue allocation on other tax calculations — Urban renewal agency terminated. [Repealed.]

§ 50-2031. Severability.

The provisions of the Idaho Urban Renewal Law of 1965, as it now exists or may hereafter be amended are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.

§ 50-2032. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable; and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.

§ 50-2033. Amendments.

Except for consolidation of revenue allocation areas, a revenue allocation area may only be amended to extend its boundaries as set forth herein. An amendment to an urban renewal plan that does not seek to increase the geographic area of the plan, or does not seek to extend the years of the plan beyond the maximum term allowed under chapter 29, title 50, Idaho Code, is not a prohibited amendment, but may be subject to the limitations set forth in section 50-2903A, Idaho Code. No plan amendment shall be interpreted to or shall cause an extension of the limitations established for the existing revenue allocation area as set forth in section 50-2904, Idaho Code. Subject to the limitations in this section and section 50-2903A, Idaho Code, an urban renewal plan that includes a revenue allocation area may be extended only one (1) time to extend the boundary of the revenue allocation so long as the total area to be added is not greater than ten percent (10%) of the existing revenue allocation area and the area to be added is contiguous to the existing revenue allocation area but such contiguity cannot be established solely by a shoestring or strip of land which comprises a railroad or public right-of-way.